Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1858.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and section 1(a) introductory paragraph, (a.1), (b), (c), (d), (e) and (g) of the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act, are amended to read:AN ACTProviding for the payment of death benefits to the surviving spouse or children or parents of firefighters, ambulance service or rescue squad members, law enforcement officers 123456789101112131415161718 [or], National Guard members or corrections officers who die as a result of the performance of their duties.Section 1. (a) In the event a law enforcement officer, ambulance service or rescue squad member, firefighter, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol [or], National Guard member or corrections officer dies as a result of the performance of [his] the individual's duties, an application, including a certification of death, shall be made to the department within three years of the date of such death by any of the following:* * *(a.1) A firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member, law enforcement officer, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol [or], National Guard member or corrections officer who suffers a fatal heart attack or stroke while on duty or not later than 24 hours after participating in a physical training exercise or responding to an emergency is presumed to have died as a result of the performance of [his] the individual's duties for purposes of this act.(b) A volunteer firefighter shall be deemed to be acting in the performance of [his] the individual's duties for the purposes of this act going to or directly returning from a fire which the fire company or fire department attended including travel from and direct return to a firefighter's home, place of business or other place where [he or she] the individual shall have been when [he or she] the individual received the call or alarm or while participating in instruction fire drills in which the fire department or fire company shall have participated or while repairing or doing other work about or on the fire 20250HB1858PN2299 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 apparatus or buildings and grounds of the fire company or fire department upon the authorization of the chief of the fire company or fire department or other person in charge or while answering any emergency calls for any purpose or while riding upon the fire apparatus which is owned or used by the fire company or fire department or while performing any other duties of such fire company or fire department as authorized by the municipality or while performing duties imposed by section 15, act of April 27, 1927 (P.L.465, No.299), referred to as the Fire and Panic Act.(c) A volunteer ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team or rescue squad member or member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol shall be deemed to be acting in the performance of [his] the individual's duties for the purposes of this act going to or directly returning from an emergency which the ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad or member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol attended including travel from and direct return to an ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad or Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol member's home, place of business or other place where [he or she] the individual shall have been when [he or she] the individual received the call or alarm or while participating in drills in which the ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad or Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol shall have participated or while repairing or doing other work about or on any emergency vehicle or buildings and grounds of the ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad or Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol upon the authorization of the chief of the ambulance service, certified 20250HB1858PN2299 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hazardous material response team, rescue squad or Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol or other person in charge while answering any emergency calls for any purpose or while riding upon any vehicles which are owned or used by the ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad or Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol.(d) Upon receipt of such certification, the Commonwealth shall, from moneys payable out of the General Fund, pay to the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, to the minor children of the paid firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or corrections officer who died as a result of the performance of [his] the individual's duty the sum of $100,000, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section and an amount equal to the monthly salary, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section, of the deceased paid firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or corrections officer, less any workers' compensation or pension or retirement benefits paid to such survivors, and shall continue such monthly payments until there is no eligible beneficiary to receive them. For the purpose of this subsection, the term "eligible beneficiary" means the surviving spouse or the child or children under the age of eighteen years or, if attending college, under the age of twenty-three years, of the firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or corrections officer who died as a result of the performance of [his] the individual's duty. When no spouse or minor children survive, a single sum of $100,000, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section, shall be paid to the parent or parents of such firefighter, 20250HB1858PN2299 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ambulance service member, rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or corrections officer.(e) The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania shall pay out of the General Fund to the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, the minor children of a National Guard member, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol, volunteer firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member who died as a result of the performance of [his] the individual's duties the sum of $100,000, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section. When no spouse or minor children survive, the benefit shall be paid to the parent or parents of such National Guard member, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol, volunteer firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member. The benefit shall be payable whether or not the National Guard member or certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol, volunteer firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member died as a result of the performance of [his] the individual's duty within the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.* * *(g) A National Guard member shall be deemed to be acting in the performance of [his] the individual's duties for the purposes of this act when:(1) [his] the individual's death occurs in an official duty status authorized under 51 Pa.C.S. § 508 (relating to active State duty for emergency); or(2) going directly to or from the place of such duties.Section 2. Section 2 of the act is amended by adding 20250HB1858PN2299 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definitions to read:Section 2. The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Correctional institution" means a correctional facility, prison or jail owned or operated by a county or the Commonwealth."Corrections officer" means an individual employed at a correctional institution to provide any security or custodial service for inmates.* * *Section 3. Sections 2.1 and 3 of the act are amended to read:Section 2.1. This act shall be broadly construed to grant benefits to firefighters, ambulance service or rescue squad members, law enforcement officers [or], National Guard personnel or corrections officers for deaths related to the performance of their duties.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately and its provisions shall be retroactive to January 1, 1976 and shall be applicable to the deaths of all firefighters, ambulance service or rescue squad members [and], law enforcement personnel and corrections officers dying on and after said date as the direct result of injuries sustained in the performance of their duties, regardless of the date when such injuries occurred.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1858PN2299 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627